Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201654-1,129
Livestock auction market or packing plant; brand inspection; election
to provide.

The owner or operator of any livestock
auction market, as defined
in section 54-1158, or packing plant located in any county outside
the brand inspection area may voluntarily elect to provide brand inspection
for all cattle brought to such livestock auction market or packing plant from
within the brand inspection area upon compliance with sections 54-1,129 to 54-1,131.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 28, p. 972;

Laws 1987, LB 450, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 76;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 54-1183;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 2.